Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-307
Type of electronic notarial acts authorized.

The following types of electronic notarial acts may be performed by an electronic notary public:

(1) Acknowledgments;

(2) Jurats;

(3) Verifications or proofs; and

(4) Oaths or affirmations.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 7.